Louisiana, session 2026, HB439.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.22 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.22. Parole ineligibility
No person committed to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections for
an offense committed on or after August 1, 2024, shall be eligible for parole under
pursuant to this Part except a person who satisfies the provisions of R.S.
15:574.4(B)(2), (D), (E), (F), (G), (H), (J), or (K).